Massachusetts, session 194th, H1123.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding after section
187H the following new section: -
Section 187I. Notwithstanding any other provision of law relative to the cancellation,
renewal or nonrenewal of an insurance policy, any insurance company may, with the agreement
of the named insured, provide such notice by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on passage.
of 1